Colorado, session 2026A, HB1178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-111, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(b), and (5) as follows:
24-75-111. Additional authority for controller to allow
expenditures in excess of appropriations - limitations - appropriations
for subsequent fiscal year restricted.
(1) For fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 1997, In addition
to any overexpenditure allowed pursuant to section 24-75-109, the
controller may allow any department, institution, or agency of the state,
including any institution of higher education, to make an expenditure in
excess of the amount authorized by an item of appropriation for such THE
CURRENT fiscal year if:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) The overexpenditure is necessary due to EITHER unforeseen
circumstances arising while the general assembly is not meeting in regular
or special session during which such overexpenditure can be legislatively
addressed OR A LAPSE IN A FEDERAL APPROPRIATION THAT THE JOINT
BUDGET COMMITTEE DETERMINES IS REASONABLY LIKELY TO OCCUR WHILE
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS NOT MEETING IN REGULAR OR SPECIAL SESSION
DURING WHICH SUCH OVEREXPENDITURE CAN BE LEGISLATIVELY
ADDRESSED; and
(5) The joint budget committee of the general assembly shall
introduce a supplemental appropriation for the fiscal year in which the
overexpenditure occurred for the AN amount of LESS THAN OR EQUAL TO any
overexpenditure allowed pursuant to this section. If a supplemental
appropriation is enacted for the overexpenditure AUTHORIZED BY THIS
SECTION or some portion thereof, the restriction on the succeeding fiscal
year's appropriation shall be released in the amount of the supplemental
appropriation enacted AND A DEPARTMENT, INSTITUTION, OR AGENCY OF THE
STATE, INCLUDING ANY INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, SHALL NOT
MAKE AN EXPENDITURE IN EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT ALLOWED BY AN ITEM OF
APPROPRIATION FOR SUCH FISCAL YEAR AS AUTHORIZED BY THE
OVEREXPENDITURE.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1178

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1178